Nebraska, session 109, LB672.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB672 LB672
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1401 Sections 49-1401 to 49-14,142 and section 2 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 2. No person shall make one or more contributions to a
candidate committee totaling more than one thousand dollars during an
election period. A candidate committee shall, within ten days after
receipt, refund any contribution from a person which exceeds a total of
one thousand dollars received during an election period from such person
and report such contribution on subsequent campaign statements disclosing
the name and address of the contributor, the amount received, the date of
receipt, and the date returned. This section does not apply to a
candidate's own personal funds contributed to that candidate's committee.
For purposes of this section, election period means the calendar year of
the election.
Sec. 3. Original section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-